Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5777.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "large-scale data center life cycle financial responsibility act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Change of ownership or control" means the sale or transfer of a controlling interest in a large-scale data center or the sale or transfer of a substantial portion of the assets of a large-scale data center. (b) "Commission" means the Michigan public service commission created in section 1 of 1939 PA 3, MCL 460.1. (c) "Construction" means the construction, erection, reconstruction, alteration, conversion, demolition, repair, moving, or equipping of buildings or structures. (d) "Construction mechanic" means a skilled or unskilled mechanic, laborer, worker, helper, assistant, or apprentice. Construction mechanic does not include executive, administrative, professional, office, or custodial employees. (e) "Consumer Price Index" means the United States Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers as defined and reported by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. (f) "Data center" means a facility, campus, or group of buildings in this state that is primarily used to house, operate, or support servers, data storage systems, networking equipment, cooling systems, power infrastructure, or other information technology equipment for the purpose of processing, storing, managing, or transmitting digital data, including, but not limited to, cloud computing, artificial intelligence computing, high-performance computing, cryptocurrency mining, or colocation services. (g) "Department" means the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (h) "Director" means the director of the department or the director's designee. (i) "Fund" means the large-scale data center financial responsibility fund created in section 23. (j) "Large-scale data center" means a data center that meets all of the following requirements: (i) Is located at a single site or at multiple sites that are contiguous or are under common ownership, lease, control, or development. (ii) Meets 1 or more of the following: (A) Has an aggregate critical information technology load of not less than 5 megawatts, including redundancy and backup capacity, whether existing, approved, projected, or designed capacity. (B) Occupies or is designed to occupy not less than 25,000 square feet of building space. (C) Is constructed or developed in phases that collectively meet or are reasonably anticipated to meet the thresholds described in sub-subparagraph (A) or (B). (iii) Is not any of the following: (A) A facility owned or operated by a hospital, school district, intermediate school district, public school academy, nonpublic school, or institution of higher education solely for its internal operations. As used in this sub-subparagraph, "school district", "intermediate school district", "public school academy", and "nonpublic school" mean those terms as defined in sections 4 to 6 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.4 to 380.6. (B) A governmental facility used exclusively for public administration or public safety. (C) Telecommunications infrastructure regulated under federal law. (D) A facility in which data processing is incidental to manufacturing, research and development, retail, or office activities. (k) "Local unit of government" means a county, township, city, or village. (l) "Operational level" means a measured activity or output of a large-scale data center, including, but not limited to, a measured activity or output that involves any of the following: (i) Energy consumption. (ii) Water withdrawals. (iii) Water discharge volumes. (iv) Emissions. (v) Air quality. (vi) Computing capacity. (vii) Land use footprint. (viii) Noise. (ix) Local infrastructure impacts. (m) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (n) "Projected operational level" means an operational level that a large-scale data center has submitted in a projection to a governmental entity or has been approved for by a governmental entity in connection with an application for a permit, site approval, utility interconnection, or other authorization. (o) "Proposed large-scale data center" means any of the following: (i) A large-scale data center that did not begin operation before the effective date of this act. (ii) A large-scale data center that began operation before the effective date of this act that is subject to a proposed expansion or modification that will increase the electrical load, water withdrawals, water discharge volumes, computing capacity, or land use footprint of the large-scale data center by not less than 10%. (iii) A data center that is subject to a proposed expansion or modification that will cause the data center to become a large-scale data center on completion of the proposed expansion or modification. (p) "Registered large-scale data center" means a large-scale data center that is registered under section 5. (q) "Required financial security" means the financial security required under section 7 or, if the director has issued a modification order under section 19, under the modification order. Sec. 5. (1) The owner or operator of a proposed large-scale data center shall not begin operation of the proposed large-scale data center unless all of the following conditions are met: (a) The owner or operator files an application for registration with the department in accordance with subsection (2). (b) The owner or operator pays a registration fee to the department in the amount of $25,000.00 if the proposed large-scale data center has a projected aggregate critical information technology load of less than 15 megawatts, $50,000.00 if the proposed large-scale data center has a projected aggregate critical information technology load equal to or greater than 15 megawatts and less than 50 megawatts, or $100,000.00 if the proposed large-scale data center has a projected aggregate critical information technology load of not less than 50 megawatts. Beginning on January 1 of the year following the effective date of this act, and by January 1 of each year thereafter, the director shall adjust each of the amounts of the registration fee by an amount determined by the state treasurer to reflect the annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index during the most recent 12-month period for which data are available, rounded to the nearest dollar. (c) The owner or operator reimburses any research costs incurred by a person in furtherance of an environmental, infrastructure, or public safety review imposed by law for the proposed large-scale data center. (d) The owner or operator posts the financial security required by the director in a written determination issued under subsection (3). (e) The director approves the application for registration in accordance with subsection (4). (2) In order to obtain approval for registration under this section, the owner or operator of a proposed large-scale data center must file an application for registration with the department on a form prescribed by the director. The application for registration must include all of the following information: (a) The location of the proposed large-scale data center. (b) The name and address of each owner and operator of the proposed large-scale data center. (c) The projected operational levels of the proposed large-scale data center. (d) Whether the proposed large-scale data center is a new large-scale data center, an expansion or modification to an existing large-scale data center, or a data center that will become a large-scale data center on completion of an expansion or modification. (e) The owner or operator's proposal for financial security to meet all of the requirements described in section 7(1). (f) Any other information required by the director. (3) Not later than 90 days after receiving an application for registration under subsection (2), the director shall determine whether the financial security proposed in the application meets all of the requirements described in section 7(1) and shall issue a written determination to the owner or operator of the proposed large-scale data center. If the director determines that the proposal does not meet all of the requirements described in section 7(1), the director shall include in the written determination a modified proposal that meets all of the requirements described in section 7(1). (4) The director shall approve an application for registration under this section if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The application for registration meets the requirements of subsection (2). (b) The owner or operator pays the registration fee required under subsection (1). (c) The owner or operator reimburses any research costs required under subsection (1). (d) The owner or operator posts the financial security required by the director in a written determination issued under subsection (3). (5) The owner or operator of a registered large-scale data center shall cease operation of the registered large-scale data center if the registration is suspended or revoked under section 19. (6) A person shall not enter into a contract that is structured to avoid the application of this act to a proposed large-scale data center through subdivision of property, phased construction, multiple ownership entities, or contractual allocation of electrical load. Sec. 7. (1) The owner or operator of a registered large-scale data center shall maintain financial security for the registered large-scale data center that meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is in the form of surety bonds, letters of credit, escrow, or equivalent instruments as determined by the director. (b) Is sufficient to cover all of the following reasonably foreseeable costs that are directly attributable to the proposed large-scale data center: (i) Environmental investigation and response. (ii) Decommissioning and site restoration. (iii) Stabilization after a prolonged cessation of operations, permanent closure, or abandonment. (iv) Postclosure monitoring. (v) Unrecovered public infrastructure costs that would otherwise be shifted to ratepayers or taxpayers. (c) Is enforceable in the event of insolvency, bankruptcy, receivership, assignment for the benefit of creditors, and dissolution. (2) Beginning on January 1 of the year following the effective date of this act, and by January 1 of each year thereafter, the director shall adjust the required financial security for each registered large-scale data center by an amount determined by the state treasurer to reflect the annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index during the most recent 12-month period for which data are available, rounded to the nearest dollar. The director shall provide written notice to the owner or operator of each registered large-scale data center of an adjustment under this subsection. (3) Upon written notice by the director of an adjustment under subsection (2) or a modification order under section 19, the owner or operator of a registered large-scale data center shall post the adjusted or modified amount not later than 90 days after receiving the written notice unless extended by the director for good cause. Sec. 9. (1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3), a person shall not enter into a contract for the construction of a large-scale data center unless the contract requires that any construction mechanics who work on the construction receive not less than the wage and fringe benefit rates prevailing in the locality in which the work is to be performed. (2) This section applies only to a contract that is entered into, amended, extended, or renewed on or after the effective date of this act. (3) This section applies only to a contract that involves a large-scale data center for which the owner or operator applied for or received an economic development incentive from a governmental entity in this state. Sec. 11. (1) The owner or operator of a registered large-scale data center shall ensure that each operational level of the registered large-scale data center does not materially exceed a projected operational level. If the director determines that an operational level of a registered large-scale data center materially exceeds a projected operational level, the director may draw upon the required financial security as the director determines is necessary to reduce the operational level or otherwise stabilize and monitor the operations of the registered large-scale data center. As used in this subsection, "materially exceed" means either of the following: (a) A difference of greater than 10%. (b) A difference that would have resulted in the denial or material modification of an authorization that a registered large-scale data center received from a governmental entity if the difference had been known to the governmental entity at the time. (2) The department may conduct or order periodic independent audits of the operational levels of a registered large-scale data center. An audit conducted under this subsection must be done in accordance with the standard auditing procedures of the department. The department may submit a request for reimbursement to the owner or operator for the reasonable cost of an audit conducted under this subsection. The department shall post the results of an audit conducted under this subsection on a website that is accessible to the public. (3) A local unit of government for the geographic area in which a registered large-scale data center is located may conduct or order independent audits and testing for the local infrastructure impacts of a registered large-scale data center. An audit conducted under this subsection must be done in accordance with the standard auditing procedures of the department if practicable. The local unit of government may submit a request for reimbursement to the owner or operator for the reasonable cost of an audit or test conducted under this subsection. (4) A person may submit a request for reimbursement to the owner or operator of a registered large-scale data center for any research costs incurred by the person in furtherance of an environmental, infrastructure, or public safety review imposed by law with respect to the registered large-scale data center. (5) The owner or operator of a registered large-scale data center shall do all of the following: (a) Comply with an independent audit or test conducted under subsection (2) or (3). (b) Promptly reimburse a person upon receipt of a request for reimbursement under subsection (2), (3), or (4). Sec. 13. (1) Not later than March 1 of each year, the owner or operator of a registered large-scale data center shall submit a written report to all of the following: (a) The governor. (b) The department. (c) The commission. (d) The secretary of the senate. (e) The clerk of the house of representatives. (f) The chairperson of each standing committee of the senate and the house of representatives having jurisdiction over natural resources and energy issues. (2) The annual report described in subsection (1) must include all of the following information for the registered large-scale data center for the immediately preceding calendar year: (a) Energy consumption. (b) Peak electrical demand. (c) Water withdrawals. (d) Water discharge volumes. (e) Source for water withdrawals and discharges. Sec. 15. (1) The owner or operator of a registered large-scale data center shall not enter into a change of ownership or control unless all of the following conditions are met: (a) The owner or operator files an application for review with the department in accordance with subsection (2). (b) The owner or operator pays a review fee to the department in the amount that the director determines is sufficient to cover the department's reasonable cost of reviewing the application. (c) The director approves the application for review in accordance with subsection (4). (2) In order to obtain approval for a change of ownership or control under this section, the owner or operator of a registered large-scale data center must file an application for review with the department on a form prescribed by the director. The application must include or attach all of the following: (a) A description of the proposed change of ownership or control. (b) The name and address of each proposed new owner or operator. (c) Copies of all documentation for the proposed change of ownership or control. (d) Explicit confirmation that the required financial security remains valid. (e) Any other information required by the director. (3) A proposed change of ownership or control under this section must meet all of the following requirements: (a) It provides for the continued and unextinguished obligations of each owner or operator under this act to a successor owner or operator. (b) It is not structured to allow an owner or operator to evade financial responsibility under this act. (c) It does not shift any liability of an owner or operator to an undercapitalized entity. (4) Not later than 90 days after receiving an application for review under subsection (2), the director shall issue a written approval or denial of the application. The director shall approve the proposed change of ownership or control if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The application for review meets the requirements of subsection (2). (b) The owner or operator pays the review fee required under subsection (1). (c) The proposed change of ownership meets the requirements of subsection (3). Sec. 17. (1) The owner or operator of a registered large-scale data center shall provide written notice to the department not later than 10 business days after the occurrence of any of the following events: (a) The owner or operator becomes insolvent, files a bankruptcy action, becomes subject to a receivership, assigns for the benefit of creditors, or dissolves. (b) The registered large-scale data center is subject to a prolonged cessation of operations. (2) If the director determines that any of the events described in subsection (1) have occurred, the director may draw upon the required financial security as the director determines is necessary to stabilize and monitor the operations of the registered large-scale data center. (3) If the director determines that a registered large-scale data center is permanently closed or abandoned, the director shall issue an order to decommission and restore the site of the registered large-scale data center in accordance with standards and timelines established by the director and may draw upon the required financial security as the director determines is necessary to decommission and restore the site. Sec. 19. (1) A person that violates this act is subject to a civil fine of not more than $100,000.00. Beginning on January 1 of the year following the effective date of this act, and by January 1 of each year thereafter, the director shall adjust the maximum amount of the civil fine by an amount determined by the state treasurer to reflect the annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index during the most recent 12-month period for which data are available, rounded to the nearest dollar. The department shall post the adjusted amount on a website that is accessible to the public. A civil fine collected under this subsection must be deposited in the fund. (2) If the director determines that a person has violated this act, the director may do any of the following: (a) Order the payment of a civil fine imposed under subsection (1). (b) Order a modification to the required financial security for a registered large-scale data center. (c) Order a person to comply with this act. (d) Reimburse a local unit of government from the fund in accordance with section 23. (e) If the violation involves material noncompliance, suspend or revoke the registration of a registered large-scale data center. (f) Seek injunctive relief through the attorney general. (3) The attorney general may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce compliance with this act or to collect a fine imposed under this act. Sec. 21. Not later than 180 days after the effective date of this act, the director shall create and maintain a database of large-scale data centers for which an application for registration has been submitted under section 5. The entry for each large-scale data center in the database must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The following information as filed by the owner or operator in accordance with section 5: (i) The location of the large-scale data center. (ii) The name and address of each owner and operator of the large-scale data center. (iii) The description of the size and capacity indicators of the large-scale data center. (b) The status of the application for registration. (c) Any suspension or revocation of the registration under section 19. Sec. 23. (1) The large-scale data center financial responsibility fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from civil fines collected under section 19 and from any other source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) The department is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (4) The department shall expend money from the fund on appropriation only for the purpose of reimbursing local units of government in accordance with subsection (5). (5) A local unit of government may submit an application for reimbursement from the fund on a form prescribed by the director. The department shall establish uniform procedures and documentation requirements for reimbursements from the fund. Reimbursements from the fund may be made only for the documented costs of a local unit of government that are directly and causally related to 1 or more of the following: (a) The operation of a registered large-scale data center in the geographic area of the local unit of government. (b) A violation of this act by the owner or operator of a registered large-scale data center in the geographic area of the local unit of government. (c) The closure of a registered large-scale data center in the geographic area of the local unit of government. Sec. 25. The department may promulgate rules to implement this act under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Enacting section 1. This act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.